test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h7_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: bræv
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: bræv
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: brævi
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: brævs
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [brøv, bræv]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [brøv, bræv]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: [brøvum, brævum]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: bræva
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: brævið
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: brævið
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: brævinum
    bræv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: brævsins
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: [brøvini, brævini]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: [brøvini, brævini]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: [brøvunum, brævunum]
    bræv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: brævanna
